Utah statutes.
78B-12-213.   Determination of parental liability.
(1)  The district court or administrative agency may issue an order
determining the amount of a parent's liability for medical expenses of a
dependent child when the parent:
(a)  is required by a prior court or administrative order to:
(i)  share those expenses with the other parent of the dependent child; or
(ii)  obtain insurance for medical expenses but fails to do so; or
(b)  receives direct payment from an insurer under insurance coverage obtained
after the prior court or administrative order was issued.
(2)  If the prior court or administrative order does not specify what
proportions of the expenses are to be shared, the district court may determine
the amount of liability as may be reasonable and necessary.
(3)  This section applies to an order without regard to when it was issued.
